California, session 20252026, AB2445.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4564) is added to Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 13. Public Infrastructure Projects and Nondisclosure Agreements4564. (a) A person shall not enter into a nondisclosure agreement relating to a public infrastructure project.(b) For purposes of this section, “public infrastructure project” means the construction of buildings, structures, or other facilities that are paid for with public funds.(c) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), any nondisclosure agreement relating to a public infrastructure project entered into on or after January 1, 2027, shall be void and unenforceable.(d) (1) This section does not prohibit a person from entering into or requesting a nondisclosure agreement that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets or proprietary information.(2) This section does not make void and unenforceable a nondisclosure agreement, or portion of a nondisclosure agreement, that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets or proprietary information.SEC. 2. Section 9112 of the Government Code is amended to read:9112. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 9108, the Joint Rules Committee may pursue the construction of a state capitol building annex or the restoration, rehabilitation, renovation, or reconstruction of the State Capitol Building Annex described in Section 9105 and any other ancillary improvements to effectuate the purposes of this article.(2) Projects authorized pursuant to this section may be pursued in phases and may include a visitor center, a relocated and expanded underground parking facility, and any related or necessary deconstruction and infrastructure work. relocated and expanded underground parking facility, a visitor center located in the constructed state capitol building annex or the restored, rehabilitated, renovated, or reconstructed State Capitol Building Annex described in Section 9105, provided that the entrance to the visitor center is not located on the west side of the west wing of the State Capitol, and any related or necessary deconstruction and infrastructure work. A project authorized pursuant to this section shall not include any significant changes to the west plaza and west steps of the west wing of the State Capitol Building in order to preserve the current design, architecture, and open space.(b) (1) All work performed pursuant to this article shall be executed and managed by the Joint Rules Committee pursuant to its authority described in subdivision (a). The Department of General Services shall provide counsel and advice to the Joint Rules Committee for purposes of the work. The work shall be undertaken pursuant to an agreement between the Joint Rules Committee, the Department of Finance or its designated representative, and the Department of General Services or its designated representative.(2) The agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) shall establish the scope, budget, delivery method, and schedule for any work undertaken pursuant to this article.(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the Joint Rules Committee, the Department of Finance or its designated representative, and the Department of General Services or its designated representative, pursuant to the agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (1), may agree to utilize any delivery method deemed appropriate and advantageous for the work performed pursuant to this article.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, any changes to the scope of the projects authorized by this section shall be agreed upon by the Joint Rules Committee, the Department of Finance or its designated representative, and the Department of General Services or its designated representative, pursuant to the agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (1).(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, all work performed pursuant to this article shall be exempt from all of the following:(A) The State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).(B) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3.(C) Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 15813) of Part 10b of Division 3.(D) Section 2807 of the Penal Code.(E) Sections 5024 and 5024.5 of the Public Resources Code.(F) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the inclusion of office space for or an emergency dispatch center of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, including any associated telecommunications or radio equipment, in the state capitol building annex constructed or the existing State Capitol Building Annex described in Section 9105 restored, rehabilitated, renovated, or reconstructed pursuant to this article shall not subject any part of the projects authorized by this article, including that office space or emergency dispatch center, to any of the following:(A) The Essential Services Buildings Seismic Safety Act of 1986 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 12.5 of the Health and Safety Code).(B) Any other law that would not otherwise apply to the projects authorized by this article but for the inclusion of the office space for or emergency dispatch center of the Department of the California Highway Patrol Patrol.(C) Any rule, regulation, standard, or requirement promulgated or enforced by the Division of the State Architect or the Office of the State Fire Marshal pursuant to the laws described in subparagraphs (A) and (B).(3) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of work performed pursuant to this article involving the Department of General Services, the department may enter into negotiations directly with any firm for the provision of services described in Section 4525.(d) Prevailing wages shall be paid to all workers employed on a project that is subject to this article, in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.(e) A nondisclosure agreement associated with construction of the state capitol building annex or any other work performed pursuant to this article shall be void and unenforceable.